Vermont, session 2025-2026, H836.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 1911c is added to read:
§ 1911c. HOSPITAL BOARD MEETINGS
(a) Application. This section shall apply to all regular, special, and
emergency meetings of a hospital board, whether in person or by electronic
means, as well as to any other assemblage of members of the hospital board at
which binding action is taken on behalf of the hospital or an affiliated entity.
As used in this section, “hospital board” means a hospital’s board of directors,
board of trustees, or other governing body.
(b) Public meetings; exceptions. Meetings of a hospital board shall be
open to the public and shall provide members of the public an opportunity to
VT LEG #386262 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.836
2026 Page 2 of 4
comment, except that a hospital board may meet in executive session to
consider business related to the following:
(1) contracts or contract negotiations for which premature general public
knowledge would reasonably place the hospital, an affiliated entity, or another
person at a substantial disadvantage;
(2) pending or probable prosecution or civil litigation to which the
hospital or an affiliated entity is or is likely to be a party;
(3) personnel matters;
(4) information that reasonably could be considered a trade secret, as
defined in 1 V.S.A. § 317(c)(9);
(5) confidential attorney-client communications;
(6) information prohibited from public disclosure by the terms of an
enforceable data use contract to which the hospital is bound; and
(7) information prohibited from public disclosure by the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, or
by any other State or federal law.
(c) Notice. A hospital board shall make its meeting schedule available to
the public by posting on the hospital’s website notice of the time and place of
each meeting at least one week before the meeting and the agenda for each
meeting at least 48 hours before the meeting, except that if an unforeseen
occurrence or condition requires the board’s immediate attention at an
VT LEG #386262 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.836
2026 Page 3 of 4
emergency meeting, the board shall provide public notice as soon as possible
before the meeting occurs.
(d) Minutes and recordings.
(1) All portions of each hospital board meeting that are open to the
public shall either be recorded or minutes shall be taken, and the recordings
and minutes shall be posted on the hospital’s website within five business days
following the meeting.
(2) Meeting minutes shall include the names of all hospital board
members present at the meeting in person or by electronic means, the names of
any other individuals who participated in the meeting, a summary of any public
comments provided at the meeting, and all actions taken or considered by the
hospital board during the meeting.
(e) Participation by electronic or other means.
(1) One or more members of a hospital board may attend a regular,
special, or emergency meeting by electronic or other means without being
physically present at a designated meeting location.
(2) Any member of a hospital board attending a meeting by electronic or
other means may participate fully in discussing the board’s business and voting
to take an action, but any vote of the board that is not unanimous shall be taken
by roll call.
VT LEG #386262 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.836
2026 Page 4 of 4
(3) Each member of a hospital board who attends a meeting without
being physically present at a designated meeting location shall:
(A) identify themselves when the meeting is convened; and
(B) be able to hear the conduct of the meeting and be heard
throughout the meeting.
(4) If a quorum or more of the members of a hospital board attend a
meeting without being physically present at a designated meeting location, the
agenda required to be posted pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall
designate at least one physical location where a member of the public can
attend and participate in the meeting. At least one member of the hospital
board or one or more members of the hospital’s staff shall be present at each
designated meeting location.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386262 v.1